Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.0531] MINNESOTA PARKINSON'S RESEARCH TRUST FUND. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section may be cited as the "Minnesota Parkinson's Research Trust Fund Act." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purpose and findings. new text end new text begin The legislature finds: new text end new text begin (1) Parkinson's disease is a progressive neurological disorder affecting approximately one million Americans, with an estimated 90,000 new diagnoses each year; new text end new text begin (2) the financial burden of Parkinson's disease on individuals, families, and the health care system is immense, with annual costs in the United States exceeding $52,000,000,000, including medical expenses and lost income; new text end new text begin (3) there is currently no cure for Parkinson's disease, and innovative research is essential to advance therapies, improve patient outcomes, and alleviate the burden of Parkinson's disease; and new text end new text begin (4) caregivers of individuals with Parkinson's disease provide critical support, often at significant personal and financial sacrifice. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Establishment of the fund. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Parkinson's Research Trust Fund is established in the state treasury. The trust fund is a special revenue fund and is not part of the general fund. Money in the trust fund is held in trust and may be expended only as provided in this section. The trust fund shall be used to support innovative research on Parkinson's disease and provide caregiver assistance as provided in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Purposes. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Parkinson's Research Trust Fund is established to: new text end new text begin (1) create and expedite innovation in research on Parkinson's disease and related disorders to: (i) improve the health of residents of Minnesota; (ii) enhance the potential for a medical or scientific breakthrough in research on Parkinson's disease and related disorders; and (iii) enhance the research superiority of Minnesota regarding Parkinson's disease and related disorders; new text end new text begin (2) attract scientific researchers and create exceptional jobs in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (3) develop and implement a research plan to foster synergistic collaboration between eligible institutions of higher education, institutional partners, and other grant recipients for research on Parkinson's disease and related disorders. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Powers and duties. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) may award grants to institutions of learning, advanced medical research facilities, public or private persons, and collaboratives in Minnesota that are involved in Parkinson's research that furthers the purposes of this section, including: new text end new text begin (i) implementation of a research plan; new text end new text begin (ii) research, including translational and clinical research, into the causes of, means of prevention of, and treatment and rehabilitation for Parkinson's disease and related disorders; new text end new text begin (iii) research, including translational research, to develop therapies, protocols, medical pharmaceuticals, or procedures for the substantial mitigation of the symptoms of Parkinson's disease and related disorders; new text end new text begin (iv) facilities, equipment, supplies, salaries, benefits, and other costs related to the research of Parkinson's disease and related disorders; and new text end new text begin (v) prevention programs and strategies to mitigate the detrimental health impacts of Parkinson's disease and related disorders; new text end new text begin (2) shall collaborate with relevant state agencies, coordinating councils, and consortiums to enhance health care and research for Parkinson's disease and related disorders; new text end new text begin (3) shall establish the appropriate standards and oversight bodies to ensure grant money is used for the purposes of this section; new text end new text begin (4) shall employ necessary staff to administer the trust fund; new text end new text begin (5) shall manage grant accounting, grant monitoring, technical and document management of the grant application review process, legal services, and compliance services; new text end new text begin (6) shall monitor grant contracts authorized by this section and ensure each grant recipient complies with the terms and conditions of the contract; new text end new text begin (7) shall ensure all grant proposals comply with this section and rules adopted under this chapter before the proposals are submitted to the oversight committee for approval; new text end new text begin (8) shall monitor grant proposals for conflicts of interest; and new text end new text begin (9) shall collaborate with the statewide research and clinical data registry for research related to Parkinson's disease and related disorders. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall implement, monitor, and, as necessary, revise the research plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administration and oversight. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall establish a Neurodegenerative Disease Advisory Council to oversee the administration of the trust fund. The advisory council shall consist of representatives from: new text end new text begin (1) leading research institutions in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) Parkinson's advocacy organizations; new text end new text begin (3) caregiver support groups; and new text end new text begin (4) the medical community specializing in neurological diseases. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory council shall establish guidelines for grant applications, selection criteria, and reporting requirements to ensure transparency and accountability. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reporting requirements. new text end new text begin Recipients of grant funds shall submit an annual report to the commissioner detailing: new text end new text begin (1) the progress of funded research; new text end new text begin (2) outcomes and measurable impacts of caregiver support programs; and new text end new text begin (3) any additional recommendations for improving the program's effectiveness. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin (a) No later than January 31 of each year, the commissioner shall prepare and submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over health finance a report on: new text end new text begin (1) the trust fund's grants under this section; new text end new text begin (2) a list of recipients of grants awarded during the preceding state fiscal year and the grant amount awarded to each recipient; new text end new text begin (3) any research accomplishments a grant recipient or the recipient's partners achieved during the preceding state fiscal year; new text end new text begin (4) an assessment of the progress of grant recipients; new text end new text begin (5) a statement of strategic research plans; new text end new text begin (6) an estimate of the financial cost to Minnesota of Parkinson's disease and related disorders during the most recent state fiscal year for which data is available, including the amounts Minnesota spent related to Parkinson's disease and related disorders under Medicaid, the Teacher Retirement System of Minnesota, and the Employees Retirement System of Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (7) a statement of grant's compliance program activities, including any recommendations identified through the activities. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must publish the report on the department's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin State plan to address neurodegenerative diseases. new text end new text begin (a) Within 12 months of the effective date of this act, the commissioner, with input from the council and stakeholders, shall develop and publish a state plan to address neurodegenerative diseases. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the plan shall include: new text end new text begin (1) current estimates of prevalence, incidence, and demographic distribution for each condition and identification of data gaps; new text end new text begin (2) a determination of objectives that include prevention, diagnosis, care, research, surveillance, workforce, and support services; new text end new text begin (3) strategies for improving early diagnosis and timely access to specialists; new text end new text begin (4) care coordination and caregiver support strategies; new text end new text begin (5) a workforce development plan, including training for neurologists, primary care clinicians, allied health professionals, and long-term care staff; new text end new text begin (6) a public awareness and education plan emphasizing equity and culturally competent outreach; new text end new text begin (7) a data and registry integration strategy, including mechanisms for secure data sharing and research access; new text end new text begin (8) a research and innovation agenda with prioritized areas for translational and clinical research; new text end new text begin (9) recommendations for sustainable financing, including public and private funding streams and potential creation of a dedicated research or program fund; and new text end new text begin (10) evaluation metrics and a schedule for monitoring, reporting, and planning updates at least every five years. new text end new text begin (c) The draft plan shall be made available for public comment for at least 30 days before finalization. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Coordination of activities. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall coordinate activities under this section with relevant federal agencies, federally supported research centers, academic medical centers, and private sector partners to leverage resources and avoid duplication. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent permitted by law, the commissioner may enter into memoranda of understanding to facilitate data sharing and collaborative research. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Protections and limitations. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require insurance coverage beyond what is otherwise required by state or federal law. new text end new text begin (b) Participation in the registry is voluntary, and no person shall be denied services or benefits for refusing to enroll. new text end new text begin (c) Data collected under this section shall not be used for nonresearch law enforcement or discriminatory purposes. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Rulemaking authority. new text end new text begin The commissioner may adopt rules or regulations necessary to implement this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin If any provision or application of this section is held invalid, the remainder shall continue in effect. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION AND ALLOCATION OF FUNDS.new text end new text begin (a) $25,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health to implement Minnesota Statutes, section 144.0531. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount in paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) $20,000,000 shall be awarded through competitive grants to state universities, research institutions, and medical centers actively engaged in Parkinson's research with priority given to innovative therapies and projects aimed at finding a cure; new text end new text begin (2) $3,000,000 shall be used to establish and expand programs that support caregivers of individuals living with Parkinson's disease, including respite care, training, and mental health resources; and new text end new text begin (3) $2,000,000 shall be used to establish a Neurodegenerative Disease Advisory Council that shall develop and publish a state plan to address neurodegenerative diseases. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end